New Jersey, session 222, A5138.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  As used in this act: Board means the Protective Cropping Board established pursuant to section 2 of this act. Department means the Department of Agriculture. Protective cropping means the modification of growing conditions for crops.  Protective cropping includes, but is not limited to, vertical farming and the practice of growing crops within, under, or sheltered by artificial structures for the purpose of protecting the crops from pests, disease, or adverse weather. Secretary means the Secretary of Agriculture. Vertical farming means the practice of growing crops within an artificial structure, in horizontally and vertically stacked layers, using artificial growing systems including, but not limited to, hydroponics or aquaponics. 2.  a.  (1)     There is established in the Department of Agriculture the Protective Cropping Board. (2)  The board shall consist of five members, appointed by the secretary.  Members of the board shall serve at the pleasure of the secretary. (3)  Members of the board shall be appointed within 30 days after the effective date of this act. (4)  The department shall provide primary staff support to the commission. b.    The duties of the board shall be to: (1)   research and investigate the practice of protective cropping and how it may be implemented in the State; (2)   develop and recommend to the department policy for the promotion of protective cropping in the State; and (3) conduct such other activities relating to protective cropping as the secretary determines necessary. c.     The secretary shall ensure that the department executes the recommendations of the board. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.